Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF795.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.13, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Examination subjects and locations; provisions for color blindness, disabled veterans. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the commissioner must examine each applicant for a driver's license by such agency as the commissioner directs. This examination must include: (1) a test of the applicant's eyesight, provided that this requirement is met by submission of a vision examination certificate under section 171.06, subdivision 7; (2) a test of the applicant's ability to read and understand highway signs regulating, warning, and directing traffic; (3) a test of the applicant's knowledge of (i) traffic laws; (ii) the effects of alcohol and drugs on a driver's ability to operate a motor vehicle safely and legally, and of the legal penalties and financial consequences resulting from violations of laws prohibiting the operation of a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or drugs; (iii) railroad grade crossing safety; (iv) slow-moving vehicle safety; (v) laws relating to pupil transportation safety, including the significance of school bus lights, signals, stop arm, and passing a school bus; (vi) traffic laws related to bicycles; and (vii) the circumstances and dangers of carbon monoxide poisoning; (4) an actual demonstration of ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor vehicle; and (5) other physical and mental examinations as the commissioner finds necessary to determine the applicant's fitness to operate a motor vehicle safely upon the highways. (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), the commissioner must not deny an application for a driver's license based on the exclusive grounds that the applicant's eyesight is deficient in color perception or that the applicant has been diagnosed with diabetes mellitus. War veterans operating motor vehicles especially equipped for disabled persons, if otherwise entitled to a license, must be granted such license. (c) The commissioner must ensure that an applicant may take an exam either in the county where the applicant resides or in an adjacent county at a reasonably convenient location. The schedule for each exam station must be posted on the department's website. (d) The commissioner shall ensure that an applicant is able to obtain an appointment for an examination to demonstrate ability under paragraph (a), clause (4), within 14 days of the applicant's request if, under the applicable statutes and rules of the commissioner, the applicant is eligible to take the examination. (e) The commissioner must provide real-time information on the department's website about the availability and location of exam appointments. The website must show the next available exam dates and times for each exam station. The website must also provide an option for a person to enter an address to see the date and time of the next available exam at each exam station sorted by distance from the address provided.new text begin The commissioner must make at least 50 percent of projected appointments available to book three months in advance, 75 percent of projected appointments available to book two months in advance, and 100 percent of projected appointments available to book one month in advance.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to examinations on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.13, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Examination fees. (a) A fee of $10 must be paid by an individual to take a third and any subsequent knowledge test administered by the department if the individual has failed two previous consecutive knowledge tests on the subject. (b) A fee of $20 must be paid by an individual to take a third and any subsequent skills or road test administered by the department if the individual has previously failed two consecutive skill or road tests in a specified class of motor vehicle. (c) A fee of deleted text begin $20deleted text end new text begin $50new text end must be paid by an individual who fails to appear for a scheduled skills or road test or who cancels a skills or road test deleted text begin withindeleted text end new text begin less thannew text end 24 hours deleted text begin ofdeleted text end new text begin beforenew text end the appointment time.new text begin A fee of $20 must be paid by an individual who cancels a scheduled skills or road test between 24 hours and 72 hours before the appointment time.new text end (d) All fees received under this subdivision must be paid into the state treasury and credited to the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to examinations on or after that date. new text end